Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Health Coverage
18A.225.
Health care insurance coverage — Requirements of prospective carriers — Analysis of carrier coverage data — Agency’s termination of participation — Provision of amount of employer contribution — Lapse of excess flexible spending account funds — Advisory Committee of State Health Insurance Subscribers — No abortion coverage — Appeal of formulary change — Retiree’s participation — Mail order drug option coverage — Hearing aid coverage for minors — Coverage for diagnosis and treatment of autism spectrum disorders — Amino acid-based elemental formula coverage — Access to certain services in contiguous counties — Study of bid variation — Regional rating bid scenario — Optometric coverage — Nondiscrimination against provider in geographic coverage area — Standards for provider participation. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The term “employee” for purposes of this section means:

Any person, including an elected public official, who is regularly employed by any department, office, board, agency, or branch of state government; or by a public postsecondary educational institution; or by any city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local government, whose legislative body has opted to participate in the state-sponsored health insurance program pursuant to KRS

79.080

; and who is either a contributing member to any one (1) of the retirement systems administered by the state, including but not limited to the Kentucky Retirement Systems, County Employees Retirement System, Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System, the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, or the Judicial Retirement Plan; or is receiving a contractual contribution from the state toward a retirement plan; or, in the case of a public postsecondary education institution, is an individual participating in an optional retirement plan authorized by KRS

161.567

; or is eligible to participate in a retirement plan established by an employer who ceases participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System pursuant to KRS

61.522

whose employees participated in the health insurance plans administered by the Personnel Cabinet prior to the employer’s effective cessation date in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System;

Any certified or classified employee of a local board of education or a public charter school as defined in KRS

160.1590

;

Any elected member of a local board of education;

Any person who is a present or future recipient of a retirement allowance from the Kentucky Retirement Systems, County Employees Retirement System, Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System, the Legislators’ Retirement Plan, the Judicial Retirement Plan, or the Kentucky Community and Technical College System’s optional retirement plan authorized by KRS

161.567

, except that a person who is receiving a retirement allowance and who is age sixty-five (65) or older shall not be included, with the exception of persons covered under KRS 61.702(2)(b)3. and 78.5536(2)(b)3., unless he or she is actively employed pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph; and

Any eligible dependents and beneficiaries of participating employees and retirees who are entitled to participate in the state-sponsored health insurance program;

The term “health benefit plan” for the purposes of this section means a health benefit plan as defined in KRS

304.17A-005

;

The term “insurer” for the purposes of this section means an insurer as defined in KRS

304.17A-005

; and

The term “managed care plan” for the purposes of this section means a managed care plan as defined in KRS

304.17A-500

.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon the recommendation of the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet, shall procure, in compliance with the provisions of KRS

45A.080

,

45A.085

, and

45A.090

, from one (1) or more insurers authorized to do business in this state, a group health benefit plan that may include but not be limited to health maintenance organization (HMO), preferred provider organization (PPO), point of service (POS), and exclusive provider organization (EPO) benefit plans encompassing all or any class or classes of employees. With the exception of employers governed by the provisions of KRS Chapters 16, 18A, and 151B, all employers of any class of employees or former employees shall enter into a contract with the Personnel Cabinet prior to including that group in the state health insurance group. The contracts shall include but not be limited to designating the entity responsible for filing any federal forms, adoption of policies required for proper plan administration, acceptance of the contractual provisions with health insurance carriers or third-party administrators, and adoption of the payment and reimbursement methods necessary for efficient administration of the health insurance program. Health insurance coverage provided to state employees under this section shall, at a minimum, contain the same benefits as provided under Kentucky Kare Standard as of January 1, 1994, and shall include a mail-order drug option as provided in subsection (13) of this section. All employees and other persons for whom the health care coverage is provided or made available shall annually be given an option to elect health care coverage through a self-funded plan offered by the Commonwealth or, if a self-funded plan is not available, from a list of coverage options determined by the competitive bid process under the provisions of KRS

45A.080

,

45A.085

, and

45A.090

and made available during annual open enrollment.

The policy or policies shall be approved by the commissioner of insurance and may contain the provisions the commissioner of insurance approves, whether or not otherwise permitted by the insurance laws.

Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to provide coverage to all members of the state group, including active employees and retirees and their eligible covered dependents and beneficiaries, within the county or counties specified in its bid. Except as provided in subsection (20) of this section, any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall also agree to rate all employees as a single entity, except for those retirees whose former employers insure their active employees outside the state-sponsored health insurance program and as otherwise provided in KRS 61.702(2)(b)3.b. and 78.5536(2)(b)3.b.

Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to provide enrollment, claims, and utilization data to the Commonwealth in a format specified by the Personnel Cabinet with the understanding that the data shall be owned by the Commonwealth; to provide data in an electronic form and within a time frame specified by the Personnel Cabinet; and to be subject to penalties for noncompliance with data reporting requirements as specified by the Personnel Cabinet. The Personnel Cabinet shall take strict precautions to protect the confidentiality of each individual employee; however, confidentiality assertions shall not relieve a carrier from the requirement of providing stipulated data to the Commonwealth.

The Personnel Cabinet shall develop the necessary techniques and capabilities for timely analysis of data received from carriers and, to the extent possible, provide in the request-for-proposal specifics relating to data requirements, electronic reporting, and penalties for noncompliance. The Commonwealth shall own the enrollment, claims, and utilization data provided by each carrier and shall develop methods to protect the confidentiality of the individual. The Personnel Cabinet shall include in the October annual report submitted pursuant to the provisions of KRS

18A.226

to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, an analysis of the financial stability of the program, which shall include but not be limited to loss ratios, methods of risk adjustment, measurements of carrier quality of service, prescription coverage and cost management, and statutorily required mandates. If state self-insurance was available as a carrier option, the report also shall provide a detailed financial analysis of the self-insurance fund including but not limited to loss ratios, reserves, and reinsurance agreements.

If any agency participating in the state-sponsored employee health insurance program for its active employees terminates participation and there is a state appropriation for the employer’s contribution for active employees’ health insurance coverage, then neither the agency nor the employees shall receive the state-funded contribution after termination from the state-sponsored employee health insurance program.

Any funds in flexible spending accounts that remain after all reimbursements have been processed shall be transferred to the credit of the state-sponsored health insurance plan’s appropriation account.

Each entity participating in the state-sponsored health insurance program shall provide an amount at least equal to the state contribution rate for the employer portion of the health insurance premium. For any participating entity that used the state payroll system, the employer contribution amount shall be equal to but not greater than the state contribution rate.

The premiums may be paid by the policyholder:

Wholly from funds contributed by the employee, by payroll deduction or otherwise;

Wholly from funds contributed by any department, board, agency, public postsecondary education institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local government; or

Partly from each, except that any premium due for health care coverage or dental coverage, if any, in excess of the premium amount contributed by any department, board, agency, postsecondary education institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local government for any other health care coverage shall be paid by the employee.

If an employee moves his or her place of residence or employment out of the service area of an insurer offering a managed health care plan, under which he or she has elected coverage, into either the service area of another managed health care plan or into an area of the Commonwealth not within a managed health care plan service area, the employee shall be given an option, at the time of the move or transfer, to change his or her coverage to another health benefit plan.

No payment of premium by any department, board, agency, public postsecondary educational institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local government shall constitute compensation to an insured employee for the purposes of any statute fixing or limiting the compensation of such an employee. Any premium or other expense incurred by any department, board, agency, public postsecondary educational institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local government shall be considered a proper cost of administration.

The policy or policies may contain the provisions with respect to the class or classes of employees covered, amounts of insurance or coverage for designated classes or groups of employees, policy options, terms of eligibility, and continuation of insurance or coverage after retirement.

Group rates under this section shall be made available to the disabled child of an employee regardless of the child’s age if the entire premium for the disabled child’s coverage is paid by the state employee. A child shall be considered disabled if he or she has been determined to be eligible for federal Social Security disability benefits.

The health care contract or contracts for employees shall be entered into for a period of not less than one (1) year.

The secretary shall appoint thirty-two (32) persons to an Advisory Committee of State Health Insurance Subscribers to advise the secretary or the secretary’s designee regarding the state-sponsored health insurance program for employees. The secretary shall appoint, from a list of names submitted by appointing authorities, members representing school districts from each of the seven (7) Supreme Court districts, members representing state government from each of the seven (7) Supreme Court districts, two (2) members representing retirees under age sixty-five (65), one (1) member representing local health departments, two (2) members representing the Kentucky Teachers’ Retirement System, and three (3) members at large. The secretary shall also appoint two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted by the Kentucky Education Association, two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted by the largest state employee organization of nonschool state employees, two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted by the Kentucky Association of Counties, two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities, and two (2) members from a list of names consisting of five (5) names submitted by each state employee organization that has two thousand (2,000) or more members on state payroll deduction. The advisory committee shall be appointed in January of each year and shall meet quarterly.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the policy or policies provided to employees pursuant to this section shall not provide coverage for obtaining or performing an abortion, nor shall any state funds be used for the purpose of obtaining or performing an abortion on behalf of employees or their dependents.

Interruption of an established treatment regime with maintenance drugs shall be grounds for an insured to appeal a formulary change through the established appeal procedures approved by the Department of Insurance, if the physician supervising the treatment certifies that the change is not in the best interests of the patient.

Any employee who is eligible for and elects to participate in the state health insurance program as a retiree, or the spouse or beneficiary of a retiree, under any one (1) of the state-sponsored retirement systems shall not be eligible to receive the state health insurance contribution toward health care coverage as a result of any other employment for which there is a public employer contribution. This does not preclude a retiree and an active employee spouse from using both contributions to the extent needed for purchase of one (1) state sponsored health insurance policy for that plan year.

The policies of health insurance coverage procured under subsection (2) of this section shall include a mail-order drug option for maintenance drugs for state employees. Maintenance drugs may be dispensed by mail order in accordance with Kentucky law.

A health insurer shall not discriminate against any retail pharmacy located within the geographic coverage area of the health benefit plan and that meets the terms and conditions for participation established by the insurer, including price, dispensing fee, and copay requirements of a mail-order option. The retail pharmacy shall not be required to dispense by mail.

The mail-order option shall not permit the dispensing of a controlled substance classified in Schedule II.

The policy or policies provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section shall provide coverage for obtaining a hearing aid and acquiring hearing aid-related services for insured individuals under eighteen (18) years of age, subject to a cap of one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) every thirty-six (36) months pursuant to KRS

304.17A-132

.

Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section shall provide coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of autism spectrum disorders consistent with KRS

304.17A-142

.

Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section shall provide coverage for obtaining amino acid-based elemental formula pursuant to KRS

304.17A-258

.

If a state employee’s residence and place of employment are in the same county, and if the hospital located within that county does not offer surgical services, intensive care services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services, diagnostic cardiac catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the employee may select a plan available in a contiguous county that does provide those services, and the state contribution for the plan shall be the amount available in the county where the plan selected is located.

If a state employee’s residence and place of employment are each located in counties in which the hospitals do not offer surgical services, intensive care services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services, diagnostic cardiac catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the employee may select a plan available in a county contiguous to the county of residence that does provide those services, and the state contribution for the plan shall be the amount available in the county where the plan selected is located.

The Personnel Cabinet is encouraged to study whether it is fair and reasonable and in the best interests of the state group to allow any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage under this section to submit bids that may vary county by county or by larger geographic areas.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the bid for proposals for health insurance coverage for calendar year 2004 shall include a bid scenario that reflects the statewide rating structure provided in calendar year 2003 and a bid scenario that allows for a regional rating structure that allows carriers to submit bids that may vary by region for a given product offering as described in this subsection:

The regional rating bid scenario shall not include a request for bid on a statewide option;

The Personnel Cabinet shall divide the state into geographical regions which shall be the same as the partnership regions designated by the Department for Medicaid Services for purposes of the Kentucky Health Care Partnership Program established pursuant to 907 KAR 1:705;

The request for proposal shall require a carrier’s bid to include every county within the region or regions for which the bid is submitted and include but not be restricted to a preferred provider organization (PPO) option;

If the Personnel Cabinet accepts a carrier’s bid, the cabinet shall award the carrier all of the counties included in its bid within the region. If the Personnel Cabinet deems the bids submitted in accordance with this subsection to be in the best interests of state employees in a region, the cabinet may award the contract for that region to no more than two (2) carriers; and

Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the Personnel Cabinet from including other requirements or criteria in the request for proposal.

Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed on or after July 12, 2006, to public employees pursuant to this section which provides coverage for services rendered by a physician or osteopath duly licensed under KRS Chapter 311 that are within the scope of practice of an optometrist duly licensed under the provisions of KRS Chapter 320 shall provide the same payment of coverage to optometrists as allowed for those services rendered by physicians or osteopaths.

Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed to public employees pursuant to this section shall comply with:

KRS

304.12-237

;

KRS

304.17A-270

and

304.17A-525

;

KRS

304.17A-600

to

304.17A-633

;

KRS

205.593

;

KRS

304.17A-700

to

304.17A-730

;

KRS

304.14-135

;

KRS

304.17A-580

and

304.17A-641

;

KRS

304.99-123

;

KRS

304.17A-138

;

KRS

304.17A-148

;

KRS

304.17A-163

and

304.17A-1631

; and

Administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to statutes listed in this subsection.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976 (1st Extra. Sess.), ch. 35, §
2; 1980, ch. 132, §
6, effective July 15, 1980; repealed and reenact. 1982, ch. 448, § 45, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 23, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 178, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 348, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 489, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 92, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 219, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 235, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 350, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 512, Part 14, § 94, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 362, § 6, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 371, § 60, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 82, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 154, § 45, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 515, § 1, effective July 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 438, § 2, effective April 21, 2000; 2001, ch. 70, § 3, effective March 15, 2001; 2002, ch. 67, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 106, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 275, § 34, effective July 1, 2002; 2002, ch. 345, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 351, § 17, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 352, §§ 1, 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 12, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2003, ch. 129, § 1, effective March 18, 2003; 2006, ch. 164, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 88, § 3, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 28, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 150, §
19, effective January 1, 2011; 2016 ch. 10, § 4, effective April 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 170, § 3, effective April 13, 2018; 2018 ch. 187, § 7, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 3, July 24, 2019; 2020 ch. 79, § 15, effective April 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 30, § 5, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 75, § 2, effective January 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 216, § 26, effective April 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 213, § 13, effective July 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 19, § 12, effective January 1, 2023.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(1/1/2023). This statute was amended by
2022 Ky. Acts chs. 19,
213, and
216, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(1/1/2023).
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 19, sec. 13, provides that the amendments made to this statute shall apply to health plans delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed on or after January 1, 2023.

18A.2251.
State employee health care plan buy-in. [Expired July 14, 1995.]

Any citizen of the United States, who has been a Kentucky resident for at least one (1) year prior to purchasing coverage under this section, shall be permitted to purchase health insurance coverage provided to state employees pursuant to KRS

18A.225

and

18A.2281

, under the same terms and conditions as state employees until the Kentucky Health Purchasing Alliance created pursuant to KRS

304.17A-020

becomes operational. The premium charged for coverage for high risk individuals as defined by the Kentucky Health Policy Board shall not exceed two hundred percent (200%) of the premium paid by the Commonwealth for state employees. Policies issued under this section shall be valid for a period of one (1) year, and at the time of the policy’s expiration the insured shall be eligible for participation in the Kentucky Health Purchasing Alliance created pursuant to KRS

304.17A-020

.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the secretary of the Cabinet for Human Resources shall provide for a system to enroll any citizen who elects to purchase health insurance coverage under subsection (1) of this section using the county offices of the Cabinet for Human Resources. Citizens desiring to purchase coverage shall do so through the office of the Cabinet for Human Resources in the county of the citizen’s residence. Payment for premiums shall be made in advance on a quarterly or annual basis, in a manner to be determined by administrative regulations of the Finance and Administration Cabinet promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

Following the close of each calendar year, the Kentucky Health Policy Board shall determine for each of the insurance plans providing coverage to state employees and persons electing to purchase coverage pursuant to this section, the net premium, being premiums less administrative expense allowances, the plan expenses, and claim expenses losses for the year, taking into account investment income and other appropriate gains and losses.

Each health insurer’s proportion of participation in the state employee health plan shall be determined annually by the Kentucky Health Policy Board based on annual statements and other reports deemed necessary by the board and filed by the insurer with the board. The proportion of participation shall be determined by multiplying the total cost of each state health insurance plan coverage operation by a fraction, the numerator of which equals that insurer’s premium and subscriber contract charges for health insurance written in the state during the preceding calendar year and the denominator of which equals the total of all premiums and subscriber contract charges written in the state. The amount of the assessment shall also be adjusted to ensure that the Commonwealth’s cost of providing coverage to state employees does not increase more than the average rate of premium growth for state employees during the five (5) years preceding July 15, 1994.

Any deficit incurred by the state employee health insurance plan shall be recouped by assessments on all health insurers doing business in the Commonwealth pursuant to the assessment formula set forth by the Kentucky Health Policy Board. The insurers may recover these amounts in the normal course of their respective businesses without time limitation.

The Kentucky Health Policy Board may abate or defer, in whole or in part, the assessment of an insurer if, in the opinion of the board, payment of the assessment would endanger the ability of the insurer to fulfill its contractual obligations. If an assessment against an insurer is abated or deferred in whole or in part, the amount by which the assessment is abated or deferred may be assessed against the other insurers in a manner consistent with the basis for assessments set forth in this section. The insurer receiving an abatement or deferment shall remain liable to the Commonwealth for the deficiency for four (4) years.

If assessments exceed actual losses and administrative expenses of the plan, the excess shall be held at interest and used by the Commonwealth to offset future losses or to reduce premiums. As used in this subsection, “future losses” includes reserves for incurred but not reported claims.

After July 14, 1995, this section shall become null and void.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 512, Part 14, § 93, effective July 15, 1994.

18A.2253.
Self-insurance for area development district employees.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

18A.225

, the area development districts may jointly establish an employee benefit fund to provide for self-insurance of all risks in the provision of benefits for district employees comparable to those that may be paid under a policy or contract procured by the secretary of Finance and Administration Cabinet as provided in KRS

18A.225

(2).

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 219, § 3, effective July 14, 1992.

18A.2254.
Self-insured plan for public employees — Contract for third-party administrator — Formulary change — Health reimbursement account, health flexible spending account, or health savings account — Public employee health insurance trust fund — Annual audit — Quarterly status reports.

Based on the recommendation of the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, in lieu of contracting with one (1) or more insurers licensed to do business in this state, shall procure, in compliance with KRS

45A.080

,

45A.085

, and

45A.090

, and reviewed by the Government Contract Review Committee pursuant to KRS

45A.705

, a contract with one (1) or more third-party administrators licensed to do business in the Commonwealth pursuant to KRS

304.9-052

to administer a self-insured plan offered to the Public Employee Health Insurance Program for public employees. The requirements for the self-insured plan shall be as follows:

The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall incorporate by reference in an administrative regulation, pursuant to KRS

13A.2251

, the plan year handbook distributed by the Department of Employee Insurance in the Personnel Cabinet to public employees covered under the self-insured plan. The plan year handbook shall contain, at a minimum, the premiums, employee contributions, employer contributions, and a summary of benefits, copays, coinsurance, and deductibles for each plan provided to public employees covered under the self-insured plan;

Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS Chapter 18A to the contrary, the administrative regulation shall not be subject to review by the Personnel Board prior to filing the administrative regulation with the Legislative Research Commission; and

The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall file the administrative regulation for the self-insured plan with the Legislative Research Commission on or before September 15 of the year before each new plan year begins;

The self-insured plan offered by the program shall cover hospice care at least equal to the Medicare benefit;

The Personnel Cabinet shall provide written notice of any formulary change to employees covered under the self-insured plan who are directly impacted by the formulary change and to the Kentucky Group Health Insurance Board fifteen (15) days before implementation of any formulary change. If, after consulting with his or her physician, the employee still disagrees with the formulary change, the employee shall have the right to appeal the change. The employee shall have sixty (60) days from the date of the notice of the formulary change to file an appeal with the Personnel Cabinet. The cabinet shall render a decision within thirty (30) days from the receipt of the request for an appeal. After a final decision is rendered by the Personnel Cabinet, the employee shall have a right to file an appeal pursuant to the utilization review statutes in KRS

304.17A-600

to

304.17A-633

. During the appeal process, the employee shall have the right to continue to take any drug prescribed by his or her physician that is the subject of the formulary changes;

The Personnel Cabinet shall develop the necessary capabilities to ensure that an independent review of each formulary change is conducted and includes but is not limited to an evaluation of the fiscal impact and therapeutic benefit of the formulary change. The independent review shall be conducted by knowledgeable medical professionals and the results of the independent review shall be posted on the Web sites of the Personnel Cabinet and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and made available to the public upon request within thirty (30) days of the notice from the Personnel Cabinet required in paragraph (c) of this subsection;

If the self-insured plan restricts pharmacy benefits to a drug formulary, the plan shall comply with and have an exceptions policy in accordance with KRS

304.17A-535

;

Premiums for all plans offered by the Public Employee Health Insurance Program to employees shall be based on the experience of the entire group; and

The plan year for the Public Employee Health Insurance Program, whether for fully insured or self-insured benefits, shall be on a calendar year basis.

In addition to any fully insured health benefit plans or self-insured plans, beginning January 1, 2015, the Personnel Cabinet shall offer a health reimbursement account or health flexible spending account for public employees insured under the Public Employee Health Insurance Program.
(2) (a) 1. In addition to any fully insured health benefit plans or self-insured plans, beginning January 1, 2015, the Personnel Cabinet shall offer a health reimbursement account or health flexible spending account for public employees insured under the Public Employee Health Insurance Program.

The Personnel Cabinet may offer a health savings account in conjunction with a high deductible health plan option as defined by 26

U.S.C. sec. 223(c)(2)

or as an optional account to which the Personnel Cabinet may deposit funds of an employee who waives coverage in accordance with paragraph (b) of this subsection, provided the employee who waives coverage is eligible to contribute to a health savings account.

If a public employee waives coverage provided by his or her employer under the Public Employee Health Insurance Program, the employer shall forward a monthly amount to be determined by the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet for that employee as an employer contribution to the health reimbursement account or health flexible spending account, but not less than one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) per month, subject to any conditions or limitations imposed by the secretary to comply with applicable federal law.

The administrative fees associated with the employee’s health savings account, health reimbursement account, or health flexible spending account shall be an authorized expense to be charged to the public employee health insurance trust fund.

The public employee health insurance trust fund is established in the Personnel Cabinet. The purpose of the public employee health insurance trust fund is to provide funds to pay medical claims and other costs associated with the administration of the Public Employee Health Insurance Program self-insured plan under a competitively bid contract as provided by KRS Chapter 45A and reviewed by the Government Contract Review Committee pursuant to KRS

45A.705

. Unless authorized by the General Assembly, the trust fund shall not utilize funds for any other purpose and the trust fund receipts from prior plan years shall not be used to pay claims and expenses for current or subsequent plan years, except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection.

In the event of a projected deficit in the trust fund balance of a prior plan year, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may declare an emergency and transfer up to twenty-five percent (25%) of another prior plan year’s balance to that plan year, provided the Governor, all members of the General Assembly, and Legislative Research Commission are notified at least thirty (30) days prior to the transfer. The Legislative Research Commission shall refer the notice to appropriate committees of jurisdiction for their review.

The following moneys shall be directly deposited into the trust fund:

Employer and employee premiums collected under the self-insured plan;

Interest and investment returns earned by the self-insured plan;

Rebates and refunds attributed to the self-insured plan; and

All other receipts attributed to the self-insured plan.

Any balance remaining in the public employee health insurance trust fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse. Any balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and be used solely for the purpose established in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection. The balance of funds in the public employee health insurance trust fund shall be invested by the Office of Financial Management consistent with the provisions of KRS Chapter 42, and interest income shall be credited to the trust fund. Any balance for a specific plan year and any subsequent interest income for that specific plan year shall be accounted for separately.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall be responsible for a financial audit of the books and records of the trust fund. The audit shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and shall be completed within ninety (90) days of the close of the fiscal year. All audit reports shall be filed with the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet.

The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet shall file a quarterly report on the status of the trust fund with the Governor, the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, the Kentucky Group Health Insurance Board, and the Advisory Committee of State Health Insurance Subscribers. The first status report shall be submitted no later than July 30, 2006, and subsequent reports shall be submitted no later than sixty (60) days following the end of each calendar quarter. The report shall include the following:

The current balance of the trust fund and the amount of the balance associated with each plan year;

A detailed description of all income to the trust fund since the last report;

A detailed description of any receipts due to the trust fund;

A total amount of payments made for medical and pharmacy claims from the trust fund by plan year;

A detailed description of all payments made to the third-party administrator of the self-insured plan by the trust fund;

Current enrollment data, including monthly enrollment since the last report, of the Public Employee Health Insurance Program self-insured plan;

Any other information the secretary may include;

Any other information requested by the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue concerning the operation of the Public Employee Health Insurance Program self-funded plan or the trust fund; and

In addition to the information required under subparagraphs 1. to 8. of this paragraph, the quarterly report filed in July and January shall also include the following:

A projection of the medical claims incurred but not yet reported that are considered liabilities to the trust fund;

A statement of any other trust fund liabilities;

A detailed calculation outlining proposed premium rates for the next plan year, including base claims, trend assumptions, administrative fees, and any proposed plan or benefit changes;

A detailed description of the current in-state and out-of-state networks provided under the plan, any changes to the networks since the last report, and any proposed changes to the in-state or out-of-state networks during the next six (6) months; and

Specific data regarding the third-party administrator’s performance under the contract. The data shall include the following:

Any results or outcomes of disease management and wellness programs;

Results of case management audits and educational and communication efforts; and

Comparison of actual measurable results to contract performance guarantees.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 252, Pt. XXIX, § 1, effective April 25, 2006; 2008, ch. 10, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2012, ch. 10, § 3, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 82, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 111, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2014). In codification, the Reviser of Statutes has altered the numbering within subsection (2) of this statute from the way it appeared in 2014 Ky. Acts ch. 82, sec. 1, under the authority of KRS 7.136(1)(c).

(4/25/2006). 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 252, Pt. XXIX, sec. 1, which created this section, was partially vetoed by the Governor on April 24, 2006, in Veto #29 and Veto #30.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. IV, 6 at 1756.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. IV, 7 at 1756.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. IV, 8 at 1756.